Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 3 Procedure

Cross references.

Disqualification of judge from presiding over new trial if judge expresses approval or disapproval of jury verdict, §

9-10-8

.

Joining of motion for new trial with motion for directed verdict, §§

9-11-50

,

17-9-22

.

5-5-40.
Time of motion for new trial generally; amendments; extension of time for filing transcript; time of hearing; priority to cases in which death penalty imposed; appeal not limited to grounds urged; new trial on court’s own motion.

All motions for new trial, except in extraordinary cases, shall be made within 30 days of the entry of the judgment on the verdict or entry of the judgment where the case was tried without a jury.

The motion may be amended any time on or before the ruling thereon.

Where the grounds of the motion require consideration of the transcript of evidence or proceedings, the court may in its discretion grant an extension of time, except in cases where the death penalty is imposed, for the preparation and filing of the transcript, which may be done any time on or before the hearing; or the court may in its discretion hear and determine the motion before the transcript of evidence and proceedings is prepared and filed.

The grounds of the motion need not be approved by the court.

The motion may be heard at any time; but, where it is not heard at the time specified in the order, it shall stand for hearing at such time as the court by order at any time may prescribe, unless sooner disposed of.

Motions for new trial in cases in which the death penalty is imposed shall be given priority.

On appeal, a party shall not be limited to the grounds urged in the motion or any amendment thereof.

The court also shall be empowered to grant a new trial on its own motion within 30 days from entry of the judgment, except in criminal cases where the defendant was acquitted.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3643; Code 1868, § 3668; Code 1873, § 3719; Code 1882, § 3719; Ga. L. 1889, p. 83, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 5484; Penal Code 1895, § 1063; Civil Code 1910, § 6089; Penal Code 1910, § 1090; Code 1933, § 70-301; Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 16; Ga. L. 1973, p. 159, § 5.

Cross references.

Death penalty generally, §

17-10-30

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article outlining proposed revisions of appellate procedure rules with comments, prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 19 Ga. B.J. 145 (1956).

For article, “A Discussion of the 1957 Amendments to Rules of Practice and Procedure in Georgia,” see 19 Ga. B.J. 395 (1957).

For article discussing results of legislative changes in appellate procedure, prior to the enactment of the Appellate Practice Act, see 20 Ga. B.J. 38 (1957).

For article discussing the preparation of an amended motion for new trial and facts concerning appellate practice in general, prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 21 Ga. B.J. 424 (1959).

For article, “The Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 451 (1965).

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

For annual survey of law of domestic relations, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 179 (1986).

For survey of 1995 Eleventh Circuit cases on trial practice and procedure, see 47 Mercer L. Rev. 907 (1996).

For annual survey of trial practice and procedure, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 405 (2006).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (2017).

For note, “Ineffective Assistance of Counsel Blues: Navigating the Muddy Waters of Georgia Law After 2010 State Supreme Court Decisions,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 1199 (2011).

For note, “Seen But Not Heard: An Argument for Granting Evidentiary Hearings to Weigh the Credibility of Recanted Testimony,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 213 (2011).

5-5-41.
Requirements as to extraordinary motions for new trial generally; notice of filing of motion; limitations as to number of extraordinary motions in criminal cases; DNA testing.

When a motion for a new trial is made after the expiration of a 30 day period from the entry of judgment, some good reason must be shown why the motion was not made during such period, which reason shall be judged by the court. In all such cases, 20 days’ notice shall be given to the opposite party.

Whenever a motion for a new trial has been made within the 30 day period in any criminal case and overruled or when a motion for a new trial has not been made during such period, no motion for a new trial from the same verdict or judgment shall be made or received unless the same is an extraordinary motion or case; and only one such extraordinary motion shall be made or allowed.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, a person convicted of a felony may file a written motion before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in his or her case for the performance of forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing.

The filing of the motion as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not automatically stay an execution.

The motion shall be verified by the petitioner and shall show or provide the following:

Evidence that potentially contains deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) was obtained in relation to the crime and subsequent indictment, which resulted in his or her conviction;

The evidence was not subjected to the requested DNA testing because the existence of the evidence was unknown to the petitioner or to the petitioner’s trial attorney prior to trial or because the technology for the testing was not available at the time of trial;

The identity of the perpetrator was, or should have been, a significant issue in the case;

The requested DNA testing would raise a reasonable probability that the petitioner would have been acquitted if the results of DNA testing had been available at the time of conviction, in light of all the evidence in the case;

A description of the evidence to be tested and, if known, its present location, its origin and the date, time, and means of its original collection;

The results of any DNA or other biological evidence testing that was conducted previously by either the prosecution or the defense, if known;

If known, the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all persons or entities who are known or believed to have possession of any evidence described by subparagraphs (A) through (F) of this paragraph, and any persons or entities who have provided any of the information contained in petitioner’s motion, indicating which person or entity has which items of evidence or information; and

The names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all persons or entities who may testify for the petitioner and a description of the subject matter and summary of the facts to which each person or entity may testify.

The petitioner shall state:

That the motion is not filed for the purpose of delay; and

That the issue was not raised by the petitioner or the requested DNA testing was not ordered in a prior proceeding in the courts of this state or the United States.

The motion shall be served upon the district attorney and the Attorney General. The state shall file its response, if any, within 60 days of being served with the motion. The state shall be given notice and an opportunity to respond at any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection.

If, after the state files its response, if any, and the court determines that the motion complies with the requirements of paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, the court shall order a hearing to occur after the state has filed its response, but not more than 90 days from the date the motion was filed.

The motion shall be heard by the judge who conducted the trial that resulted in the petitioner’s conviction unless the presiding judge determines that the trial judge is unavailable.

Upon request of either party, the court may order, in the interest of justice, that the petitioner be at the hearing on the motion. The court may receive additional memoranda of law or evidence from the parties for up to 30 days after the hearing.

The petitioner and the state may present evidence by sworn and notarized affidavits or testimony; provided, however, any affidavit shall be served on the opposing party at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

The purpose of the hearing shall be to allow the parties to be heard on the issue of whether the petitioner’s motion complies with the requirements of paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, whether upon consideration of all of the evidence there is a reasonable probability that the verdict would have been different if the results of the requested DNA testing had been available at the time of trial, and whether the requirements of paragraph (7) of this subsection have been established.

The court shall grant the motion for DNA testing if it determines that the petitioner has met the requirements set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection and that all of the following have been established:

The evidence to be tested is available and in a condition that would permit the DNA testing requested in the motion;

The evidence to be tested has been subject to a chain of custody sufficient to establish that it has not been substituted, tampered with, replaced, or altered in any material respect;

The evidence was not tested previously or, if tested previously, the requested DNA test would provide results that are reasonably more discriminating or probative of the identity of the perpetrator than prior test results;

The motion is not made for the purpose of delay;

The identity of the perpetrator of the crime was a significant issue in the case;

The testing requested employs a scientific method that has reached a scientific state of verifiable certainty such that the procedure rests upon the laws of nature; and

The petitioner has made a prima facie showing that the evidence sought to be tested is material to the issue of the petitioner’s identity as the perpetrator of, or accomplice to, the crime, aggravating circumstance, or similar transaction that resulted in the conviction.

If the court orders testing pursuant to this subsection, the court shall determine the method of testing and responsibility for payment for the cost of testing, if necessary, and may require the petitioner to pay the costs of testing if the court determines that the petitioner has the ability to pay. If the petitioner is indigent, the cost shall be paid from the fine and bond forfeiture fund as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 21 of Title 15.

If the court orders testing pursuant to this subsection, the court shall order that the evidence be tested by the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation. In addition, the court may also authorize the testing of the evidence by a laboratory that meets the standards of the DNA advisory board established pursuant to the DNA Identification Act of 1994, Section 14131 of Title 42 of the United States Code, to conduct the testing. The court shall order that a sample of the petitioner’s DNA be submitted to the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and that the DNA analysis be stored and maintained by the bureau in the DNA data bank.

If a motion is filed pursuant to this subsection the court shall order the state to preserve during the pendency of the proceeding all evidence that contains biological material, including, but not limited to, stains, fluids, or hair samples in the state’s possession or control.

The result of any test ordered under this subsection shall be fully disclosed to the petitioner, the district attorney, and the Attorney General.

The judge shall set forth by written order the rationale for the grant or denial of the motion for new trial filed pursuant to this subsection.

The petitioner or the state may appeal an order, decision, or judgment rendered pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3645; Code 1868, § 3670; Ga. L. 1873, p. 47, § 1; Code 1873, § 3721; Code 1882, § 3721; Civil Code 1895, § 5487; Penal Code 1895, § 1064; Civil Code 1910, § 6092; Penal Code 1910, § 1091; Code 1933, § 70-303; Ga. L. 2003, p. 247, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 1-2/SB 80; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 5/HB 942; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-4/HB 233.

The 2011 amendment,

effective May 11, 2011, deleted “serious violent” and “as defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1” preceding and following “felony” in paragraph (c)(1).

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (c)(1).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “fine and bond forfeiture fund as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 21” for “fine and forfeiture fund as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 5” at the end of paragraph (c)(8). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Granting of new trial based on newly discovered evidence, §

5-5-23

.

Extensions of time for filing of motions for new trial, §

9-11-6

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 247, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 5-5-41, any person convicted of a serious violent felony as defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1, which conviction was imposed prior to the effective date of this Act, who has, prior to the effective date of this Act, filed an extraordinary motion for new trial, may file an extraordinary motion for new trial pursuant to Section 1 of this Act if the issue of DNA testing was not raised or denied in the prior extraordinary motion for new trial.
In any extraordinary motion for new trial allowed pursuant to Section 1 of this Act, the court shall not have jurisdiction to reconsider any other issue raised in the first extraordinary motion for new trial. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (c)(4)(B) of Code Section 5-5-41, any person convicted of a serious violent felony as defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1, which conviction was imposed prior to the effective date of this Act, who has, prior to the effective date of this Act, previously litigated in a court of this state or the United States the issue of postconviction DNA testing and who was denied DNA testing may file an extraordinary motion for new trial pursuant to Section 1 of this Act.” This Act became effective May 27, 2003.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 264, § 1-1/SB 80, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Johnia Berry Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of death penalty decisions, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 139 (2005).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 119 (2003).

For note, “Seen But Not Heard: An Argument for Granting Evidentiary Hearings to Weigh the Credibility of Recanted Testimony,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 213 (2011).

For note, “It’s All In The DNA — How

United States v. Hano

Extends the Statute of Limitations for the Eleventh Circuit,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 1191 (2020).

For comment on Williams v. Georgia, 24 U.S.L.W. 3191 (Jan. 17, 1956), discussing whether a challenge to the entire panel could be raised by an extraordinary motion for new trial, see 18 Ga. B.J. 350 (1956).

5-5-42.
Form for motion for new trial.

The form for motion for new trial in civil cases prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be sufficient, but any other form substantially complying therewith shall also be sufficient.

Form for motion for new trial in civil cases:

The form for motion for new trial in criminal cases in subsection (d) of this Code section is declared to be sufficient but any other form substantially complying therewith shall also be sufficient.

Form for motion for new trial in criminal cases:

IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) Plaintiff ) ) v. )
Civil Action )
File no. ) Defendant ) ) MOTION FOR NEW TRIAL Defendant moves the court to set aside the verdict returned herein on , , and the judgment entered thereon on , , and to grant a new trial on the following grounds:
(date)
(date)
(1) The verdict is contrary to law. (2) The verdict is contrary to the evidence. (3) The verdict is strongly against the weight of the evidence. (4) The court erred in permitting witness Smith to testify as follows: . (5) The court erred in failing to charge the jury on unavoidable accident as requested in writing by defendant. (6) The court erred in charging the jury as follows: . Dated: . Attorney for defendant Address (Here set forth rule nisi and certificate of service.)

Click to view

IN THE COURT OF COUNTY STATE OF GEORGIA ) The State ) ) v. )
Indictment )
Accusation ) Defendant )
File no. MOTION FOR NEW TRIAL Defendant moves the court to set aside the verdict returned herein on , , and the sentence entered thereon on , , and to grant a new trial on the following grounds:
(date)
(date)
(1) The defendant should be acquitted and discharged due to the state’s failure to prove guilt beyond a reasonable doubt. (2) Although the state proved the defendant’s guilt beyond a reasonable doubt, the evidence was sufficiently close to warrant the trial judge to exercise his discretion to grant the defendant a retrial. (3) The court committed an error of law warranting a new trial. Dated: . Attorney for defendant Address (Here set forth rule nisi and certificate of service.)

Click to view

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 20; Ga. L. 1983, p. 702, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 5.

Cross references.

Form of motion to dismiss, presenting defense of failure to state a claim, §

9-11-119

.

Law reviews.

For article, “1966 Amendments to the Appellate Procedure Act of 1965,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 433 (1966).

5-5-43.
Allowance of filing of motion by judge other than trial judge.

A judge who did not try the case may, if presented with a motion for new trial within 30 days from the date of the verdict or judgment sought to be set aside, allow the filing of, issue rule nisi thereon, and decide the motion either where he is presiding in the court in which the trial was had, or where he is named in the rule, or where he is otherwise authorized by law to do so.

History.

Code 1863, § 3644; Code 1868, § 3669; Code 1873, § 3720; Code 1882, § 3720; Civil Code 1895, § 5486; Civil Code 1910, § 6091; Code 1933, § 70-103; Ga. L. 1957, p. 224, § 13.

History of Code section. —

This Code section is derived from the decision in Field v. Thornton,

1 Ga. 306

(1846).

Law reviews.

For article, “A Discussion of the 1957 Amendments to Rules of Practice and Procedure in Georgia,” see 19 Ga. B.J. 395 (1957).

5-5-44.
Service of rule nisi; filing and recordation of motion.

In all motions for a new trial the opposite party shall be served with a copy of the rule nisi unless such copy is waived. The clerks of the courts shall not be required, except by order of the presiding judge, to enter upon the minutes of the courts motions for new trial in cases tried therein; but the motions shall be filed in the clerk’s office as are other papers and shall be recorded together with the other pleadings in the cases when the same are finally disposed of as required by law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3648; Code 1868, § 3673; Code 1873, § 3723; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 138, § 1; Code 1882, § 3723; Civil Code 1895, § 5475; Penal Code 1895, § 1065; Civil Code 1910, § 6080; Penal Code 1910, § 1092; Code 1933, § 70-306.

Law reviews.

For articles discussing the preparation of an amended motion for new trial and facts concerning appellate practice in general, prior to the adoption of the Appellate Practice Act, see 21 Ga. B.J. 424 (1959).

5-5-45.
Amendment of rule nisi.

A rule nisi for a new trial may be amended by adding new grounds not taken at the time the motion was filed.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3432; Code 1868, § 3452; Code 1873, § 3503; Code 1882, § 3503; Civil Code 1895, § 5121; Civil Code 1910, § 5705; Code 1933, § 70-309.

5-5-46.
Operation of rule nisi as supersedeas in criminal cases; superseding of sentence.

The rule nisi on a motion for a new trial in a criminal case shall not operate as a supersedeas unless it is so ordered by the court.

When requested to do so by the defendant or his counsel, the judge trying the case shall grant an order superseding the sentence until the motion for a new trial is heard and decided.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3649; Code 1868, § 3674; Code 1873, § 3724; Code 1882, § 3724; Ga. L. 1899, p. 77, § 1; Penal Code 1895, § 1066; Penal Code 1910, § 1093; Code 1933, § 70-308.

Cross references.

Stay of proceedings for enforcement of civil judgment, §

9-11-62

.

Termination of appeal bonds in criminal cases, §

17-6-1

.

Law reviews.

For article outlining proposed revisions of appellate procedure rules with comments, prior to the adoption of
T. 5, C. 6, A. 2, see 19 Ga. B.J. 145 (1956).

5-5-47.
Right to give supersedeas bond for bailable offense upon filing of new trial motion; assessment and approval of bond.

It shall be the right of any person convicted of a crime which is bailable under the law, and in which case a motion for a new trial has been filed as provided by law, to give a supersedeas bond immediately upon the filing of the motion for new trial without having to wait for the filing of a notice of appeal.

The judge of the court having jurisdiction of the case, immediately upon the approval and filing of a motion for new trial therein, shall assess the amount of the bond, which shall be approved in the manner provided by law.

The provisions of Code Section 5-6-45, relating to supersedeas and supersedeas bonds when a notice of appeal is filed, shall apply equally to cases when a motion for a new trial is filed.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 157, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 6-1006, 6-1007; Ga. L. 1984, p. 415, § 1.

Cross references.

Termination of appeal bonds in criminal cases, §

17-6-1

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Ingram v. Grimes,

213 Ga. 652

,

100 S.E.2d 914

(1957), holding that the granting of bail after conviction rests on the discretion of the trial court even when a motion for new trial is pending, see 21 Ga. B.J. 235 (1958).

5-5-48.
Time of new trial generally.

When a new trial has been granted by the court, the case shall be placed on the docket for trial as though no trial had been had, subject to the rules for continuances provided in this Code.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3646; Code 1868, § 3671; Code 1873, § 3722; Code 1882, § 3722; Civil Code 1895, § 5489; Civil Code 1910, § 6094; Code 1933, § 70-401.

5-5-49.
Trial of cases returned for new trial by appellate courts.

A case decided by the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals which is not finally disposed of by the decision shall stand for further hearing at the term next ensuing after the decision by the appellate court unless the lower court is in session when the decision is made, in which event it shall stand for trial during such term of the lower court.

The clerk of the lower court, upon receipt of the remittitur of the appellate court, shall docket the case for trial in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section.

The judge presiding may in his discretion postpone the hearing of any such case to a day in the term as to him may seem reasonable; or, if necessary to give proper time for preparation, he may continue the case until the next term of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 103, §§ 1-3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 5490, 5491, 5492; Civil Code 1910, §§ 6095, 6096, 6097; Code 1933, §§ 70-402, 70-403, 70-404.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding continuance of cases returned by appellate courts for trial, §§

9-10-162

,

17-8-34

.

5-5-50.
Standard for review by appellate court of first grant of new trial.

The first grant of a new trial shall not be disturbed by an appellate court unless the appellant shows that the judge abused his discretion in granting it and that the law and facts require the verdict notwithstanding the judgment of the presiding judge.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 5585; Civil Code 1910, § 6204; Code 1933, § 6-1608.

History of Code section. —

This Code section is derived from the decision in Sparks v. Noyes,

64 Ga. 437

(1879).

Law reviews.

For article comparing sections of Ch. 11, T. 9 with preexisting provisions of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 295 (1967).

5-5-51.
Written basis for exercise of judicial discretion for new trial.

In all civil cases in which a new trial is granted, if the grant of a new trial is based on the discretion of the judge, the judge shall set forth by written order the reason or reasons for the exercise of his discretion. Such order shall not be required to conform to the provisions of Code Section 9-11-52, relating to findings by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

5-5-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1312, § 1.